Hawaii, session 2026, HB2182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that people aged sixty-five and older make up twenty per cent of the state's population and twenty-three per cent of the city and county of Honolulu's total population translating to about two hundred eighty thousand to three hundred thousand people.  This figure is expected to increase to twenty-nine per cent by the year 2040.  Sixty-six per cent of the State's total adult population live on the island of Oahu alone.  According to the executive office on aging, there are 1,790 long-term care facilities with a total of 12,942 beds.  This report revealed a great disparity between the State's aging population and the available resources of care.  Furthermore, many long-term care facilities are experiencing closures across the state. These closures stem from financial difficulties, staff shortages, and regulatory issues.  In July 2022, a prominent nursing home in Wahiawa closed its doors due to financial shortfalls and infrastructure challenges, displacing sixty residents.  Additionally, in 2023, the increased costs from Medicaid reimbursement changes and a statewide labor shortage resulted in a home healthcare provider shutting down.  That closure resulted in only eight at-home healthcare providers remaining to serve the entire island with many of these types of facilities having extensive waiting lists. The Healthcare Association of Hawaii stated that the job vacancy rate for kupuna care is at thirty-nine per cent.  Labor shortages and increased job vacancies across the state may result in unsafe staffing levels threatening the potential of elder neglect and harm. The purpose of this Act is to provide funding to the Department of Human Services to conduct a study to recommend legislation to address the issue of long-term care facility closures. SECTION 2. (a) The department of human services shall conduct a study and submit a report on the following factors to improve the overall landscape of elderly care in the state: (1)  Current rates of Medicaid and Medicare reimbursement; (2)  Labor and workforce shortages in the field of elderly care and current wages; (3)  Inflationary costs for healthcare services and facility expenses in comparison with the current cost of living; and (4)  Identification of any barriers to licensure. (b)  The department of human services shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________